Hawaii statutes.
§50-7 Powers of the commission. The
charter commission shall hold public hearings and sponsor public forums and in
general provide for the widest possible public information and discussion
respecting the purpose and progress of its work. It shall receive the
assistance of any officer or employee of the county without extra compensation
as it may request to carry out its functions. It may, with the approval of the
legislative body of the county, appoint staff members and consultants as it
deems necessary. [L 1963, c 73, pt of §2; Supp, §143A-7; HRS §50-7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next